magyarispell/tmp/magyar.aff
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékénál +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékétól +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéhoz +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéig +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékévá +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéval +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéért +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéul +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS] 



 [^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéi +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
 
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéit +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéinak +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéiban +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéiba +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéiból +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéin +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéiról +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéira +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéinál +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéitól +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéihoz +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéiig +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéivá +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéival +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéiért +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adékéiul +[POSS_SG_1]+[ék_FAMILIAR_noun]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS] 




[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	am +[POSS_SG_1]+[NOM]
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	am/& +[POSS_SG_1]+[ACC]

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amat +[POSS_SG_1]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amnak +[POSS_SG_1]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amban +[POSS_SG_1]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amba +[POSS_SG_1]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amból +[POSS_SG_1]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amon +[POSS_SG_1]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amról +[POSS_SG_1]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amra +[POSS_SG_1]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amnál +[POSS_SG_1]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amtól +[POSS_SG_1]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amhoz +[POSS_SG_1]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amig +[POSS_SG_1]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	ammá +[POSS_SG_1]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	ammal +[POSS_SG_1]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amért +[POSS_SG_1]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amul +[POSS_SG_1]+[ESS] 





[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amé +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amét +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	aménak +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améban +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améba +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améból +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amén +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améról +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améra +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	aménál +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amétól +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améhoz +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améig +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amévá +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améval +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améért +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améul +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS] 



 [^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améi +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
 
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améit +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améinak +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améiban +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améiba +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améiból +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améin +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améiról +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améira +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améinál +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améitól +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améihoz +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améiig +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améivá +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améival +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améiért +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	améiul +[POSS_SG_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS] 








[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amként +[POSS_SG_1]+[FORM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	amkor +[POSS_SG_1]+[TEMP] 




[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	ad +[POSS_SG_2]+[NOM]
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	ad/& +[POSS_SG_2]+[ACC]

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adat +[POSS_SG_2]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adnak +[POSS_SG_2]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adban +[POSS_SG_2]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adba +[POSS_SG_2]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adból +[POSS_SG_2]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adon +[POSS_SG_2]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adról +[POSS_SG_2]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adra +[POSS_SG_2]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adnál +[POSS_SG_2]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adtól +[POSS_SG_2]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adhoz +[POSS_SG_2]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adig +[POSS_SG_2]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	addá +[POSS_SG_2]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	addal +[POSS_SG_2]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adért +[POSS_SG_2]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adul +[POSS_SG_2]+[ESS] 





[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adé +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adét +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adénak +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéban +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéba +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéból +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adén +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéról +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéra +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adénál +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adétól +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéhoz +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéig +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adévá +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéval +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéért +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéul +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS] 



 [^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéi +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
 
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéit +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéinak +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéiban +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéiba +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéiból +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéin +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéiról +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéira +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéinál +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéitól +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéihoz +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéiig +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéivá +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéival +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéiért +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adéiul +[POSS_SG_2]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS] 








[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adként +[POSS_SG_2]+[FORM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	adkor +[POSS_SG_2]+[TEMP] 




[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unk +[POSS_PL_1]+[NOM]
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unk/& +[POSS_PL_1]+[ACC]


[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkat +[POSS_PL_1]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unknak +[POSS_PL_1]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkban +[POSS_PL_1]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkba +[POSS_PL_1]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkból +[POSS_PL_1]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkon +[POSS_PL_1]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkról +[POSS_PL_1]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkra +[POSS_PL_1]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unknál +[POSS_PL_1]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unktól +[POSS_PL_1]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkhoz +[POSS_PL_1]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkig +[POSS_PL_1]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkká +[POSS_PL_1]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkkal +[POSS_PL_1]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkért +[POSS_PL_1]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkul +[POSS_PL_1]+[ESS] 





[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unké +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[NOM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkét +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkénak +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéban +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéba +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéból +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkén +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéról +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéra +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkénál +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkétól +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéhoz +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéig +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkévá +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéval +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéért +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéul +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[ESS] 



 [^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéi +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[NOM]
 
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéit +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéinak +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéiban +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéiba +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéiból +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéin +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéiról +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéira +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéinál +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ADE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéitól +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ABL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéihoz +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ALL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéiig +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TERM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéivá +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[TRANS] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéival +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[INSTR] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéiért +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[CAUS/FIN] 



[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkéiul +[POSS_PL_1]+[POSSESSEE]+[PLUR]+[ESS] 








[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkként +[POSS_PL_1]+[FORM] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	unkkor +[POSS_PL_1]+[TEMP] 




[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atok +[POSS_PL_2]+[NOM]
[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atok/& +[POSS_PL_2]+[ACC]

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atokat +[POSS_PL_2]+[ACC] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atoknak +[POSS_PL_2]+[DAT] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atokban +[POSS_PL_2]+[INE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atokba +[POSS_PL_2]+[ILL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atokból +[POSS_PL_2]+[ELA] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atokon +[POSS_PL_2]+[SUE] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atokról +[POSS_PL_2]+[DEL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atokra +[POSS_PL_2]+[SBL] 

[^aáéiíoóöõuúüû]	>	atoknál +[POSS_PL_2]+[ADE] 
